Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1417
Revived action; when tried.

When, by the provisions of sections 25-1405 to 25-1416, an action stands revived, the trial thereof shall not be postponed by reason of the revivor, if the action would have stood for trial at the term the revivor is complete, had no death or cessation of powers taken place.

R.S.1867, Code § 470, p. 471;

R.S.1913, § 8038;

C.S.1922, § 8979;

C.S.1929, § 20-1417;

R.S.1943, § 25-1417.